District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-4323

Service of process; appointment of Superintendent as attorney of companies; violations.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-233, § 12, 42 DCR 24

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-423.